Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-527
Health claim form; director; duties.

The Director of Insurance shall develop uniform claim forms and uniform electronic transfer procedures for issuers, institutional care providers, and health care practitioners. The director shall consult with interested individuals and associations who have expertise in the development and maintenance of uniform claim forms and procedures. The director shall utilize forms available from state and federal sources and may modify such forms to meet the specific needs for health care in this state.

Laws 1994, LB 1222, § 55.